Hawaii, session 2025, GM1425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 201H-206, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows:
"(b) Loans shall be awarded in the following descending
order of priority:
(1) Projects or units in projects that are funded by
programs of the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development, United States Department of
Agriculture Rural Development, and United States
Department of the Treasury Community Development
Financial Institutions Fund, wherein:
(A) At least fifty per cent of the available units
are reserved for persons and families having
incomes at or below eighty per cent of the median
family income and of which at least five per cent
of the available units are for persons and
families having incomes at or below fifty per
cent of the median family income; and
2025-2744 SB572 CDl SMA.docx
IIHIIfflIlfflIlilllillHUnH

Page 2 572
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(B) The remaining units are reserved for persons and
families having incomes at or below one hundred
twenty per cent of the median family income;
[aftd]
(2) Mixed-income affordable for-sale housing projects or
units in a mixed-income affordable for-sale housing
project wherein all of the available units are
reserved for persons and families having incomes at or
below one hundred per cent of the median family
income[—]; and
(3) Loan funds administered by certified nonprofit
community development financial institutions to
finance the development, pre-development
construction, acquisition, preservation, and
substantial rehabilitation of affordable for-sale
housing for persons and families having incomes set
forth in paragraphs (1) and (2).
(c) Moneys in the fund shall be used to provide loans for
the development, pre-development, construction, acquisition,
preservation, and substantial rehabilitation of affordable
for-sale housing units. Uses of moneys in the fund may include
2025-2744 SB572 GDI SMA.docx
iiiniwiiiiiHiiiiiigiiHn

Page 3 S.B. NO. S.1
C.D. 1
but are not limited to planning, design, and land acquisition,
including the costs of options, agreements of sale, and down
payments; [equity] financing as matching funds for nonprofit
community development financial institutions [-^j to mobilize
philanthropic, private, or other public funding sources; or
other housing development services or activities as provided in
rules adopted by the corporation pursuant to chapter 91. The
rules may provide that money from the fund shall be leveraged
with other financial resources to the extent possible."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2744 SB572 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiiilwininiiHiiiiiiiiiifflw

S.B. NO.
-1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July .2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 572, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
124

SB No. 572, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives